South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3037.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 17-13-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 17-13-20.  A citizen may arrest a person in the nighttime by efficient means as the darkness and the probability of escape render necessary, even if the life of the person should be taken, when the person: (a) has committed a felony; (b) has entered a dwelling house without express or implied permission; (c) has broken or is breaking into an outhouse with a view to plunder; (d) has in his possession stolen property;  or (e) being under circumstances which raise just suspicion of his design to steal or to commit some felony, flees when he is hailed has entered a dwelling house without express or implied permission. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----